North Carolina statutes. Chapter 159D. The North Carolina Capital Facilities Financing Act.
Article 1. Industrial and Pollution Control Facilities Financing.
§ 159D-12.
Security documents.

Bonds issued under the provisions of this Article may be secured by a security document which may be a trust instrument between the agency and a bank or trust company or individual within the State, or a bank or a trust company without the State, as trustee. Such security document may pledge and assign the revenues provided for the security of the bonds, including proceeds from the sale of any project, or part thereof, insurance proceeds and condemnation awards, and may convey or mortgage the project and other property to secure a bond issue.The revenues and other funds derived from the project, except any part necessary to provide reserves shall be set aside at such regular intervals as may be provided in such security document in a sinking fund which may be pledged to, and charged with, the payment of the principal of and the interest on such bonds as they become due and the redemption price or the purchase price of bonds retired by call or purchase as therein provided. Such pledge shall be valid and binding from the time when the pledge is made. The revenues so pledged and thereafter received by the agency shall immediately be subject to the lien of such pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act, and the lien of any such pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract or otherwise against the agency, irrespective of whether such parties have notice thereof. The use and disposition of money to the credit of such sinking fund shall be subject to the provisions of the security document. Such security document may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders as may be reasonable and proper and not in violation of law, including, without limitation, any one or more of the following:

Acceleration of all amounts payable under the security document;

Appointment of a receiver to manage the project and any other property mortgaged or assigned as security for the bonds;

Foreclosure and sale of the project and any other property mortgaged or assigned as security for the bonds; and

Rights to bring and maintain such other actions at law or in equity as may appear necessary or desirable to collect the amounts payable under, or to enforce the covenants made in, the security document.

It is lawful for any bank or trust company incorporated under the laws of this State which may act as depositary of the proceeds of bonds, revenues or other funds provided under this Article to furnish such indemnifying bonds or to pledge such securities as may be required by the agency. All expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of such security document may be treated as a part of the cost of the project in connection with which bonds are issued or as an expense of administration of such project.The agency may subordinate the bonds or its rights under the financing agreement or otherwise to any prior, contemporaneous or future securities or obligations or lien, mortgage or other security interest.Any such security document may contain such additional provisions as in the determination of the agency are necessary or convenient or effectuate the purposes of this Article.

History.

1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1198, s. 1; 2000-179, s. 2.

§ 159D-13.
Trust funds.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, all money received pursuant to the authority of this Article, whether as proceeds from the sale of bonds or as revenues, are trust funds to be held and applied solely as provided in this Article. The security document may provide that any of the money may be temporarily invested and reinvested pending its disbursement in any securities and other investments as provided in such security document, and shall provide that any officer with whom, or any bank or trust company with which, the money is deposited shall act as trustee and shall hold and apply it for the purpose of this Article, subject to any regulations this Article and the security document provide.

History.

1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1198, s. 1; 2000-179, s. 2.

§ 159D-14.
Tax exemption.

The agency is not required to pay any taxes on any project or on any other property owned by the agency under the provisions of this Article or upon the income from the property.

The interest on bonds issued by the agency is exempt from all income taxes within the State.

All projects and all transactions for them are subject to taxation to the extent they would be subject to taxation if no public body were involved with them.

History.

1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1198, s. 1; 2000-179, s. 2.

§ 159D-15.
Construction contracts.

The agency may agree with the prospective operator that all contracts relating to the acquisition, construction, installation and equipping of a project shall be solicited, negotiated, awarded and executed by the prospective operator and its agents subject only to such approval by the agency as the agency may require in such agreement. Such agreement may provide that the agency may, out of the proceeds of bonds, make advances to or reimburse the operator for all or a portion of its costs incurred in connection with such contracts.

History.

1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1198, s. 1; 2000-179, s. 2.

§ 159D-16.
Conflict of interest.

If any officer, commissioner or employee of the agency is interested either directly or indirectly in any contract with the agency, such interest shall be disclosed to the agency and shall be set forth in the minutes of the agency, and the officer, commissioner, employee or member having such interest shall not participate on behalf of the agency in the authorization of the project. This section does not apply to the ownership of less than one percent (1%) of the stock of any operator or obligor. Failure to take any or all actions necessary to carry out the purposes of this section does not affect the validity of bonds issued pursuant to the provisions of this Article.

History.

1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1198, s. 1; 2000-179, s. 2.

§ 159D-17.
Credit of State not pledged.

Bonds issued under the provisions of this Article do not constitute a debt of the State or any political subdivision or a pledge of the faith and credit of the State or any political subdivisions, but shall be payable solely from the revenues and other funds provided for payment. Each bond issued under this Chapter shall contain on its face a statement to the effect that the agency shall not be obligated to pay the bonds or the interest on it except from the revenues and other funds pledged for payment and that neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the State or any political subdivision is pledged to the payment of the principal of or the interest on the bonds.

History.

1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1198, s. 1; 2000-179, s. 2.

§ 159D-18.
Bonds eligible for investment.

Bonds issued by the agency under the provisions of this Article are securities in which all public officers and agencies of the State and all political subdivisions, and all insurance companies, trust companies, banking associations, investment companies, executors, administrators, trustees and other fiduciaries may properly and legally invest funds, including capital in their control or belonging to them.

History.

1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1198, s. 1; 2000-179, s. 2.

§ 159D-19.
Revenue refunding bonds.

The agency is authorized to provide by resolution for the issuance of refunding bonds of the agency for the purpose of refunding any bonds then outstanding that have been issued under the provisions of this Article, or under the provisions of Chapter 159C of the General Statutes, including the payment of any redemption premium and any interest accrued or to accrue to the date of redemption of such bonds, and, if considered advisable by the agency, for either or both of the following additional purposes:

Constructing improvements, additions, extensions or enlargements of the project or projects in connection with which the bonds to be refunded shall have been issued; and

Paying all or any part of the cost of any additional project or projects.

(a1)

The issuance of bonds, the maturities and other details thereof, the rights of the holders thereof, and the rights, duties and obligations of the agency in respect to the bonds are governed by the provisions of this Article that relate to the issuance of bonds.The approvals required by

G.S. 159D-7

and

G.S. 159D-8

shall be obtained prior to the issuance of any refunding bonds, except that in the case where the refunding bonds of all or a portion of an issue are to be issued solely for the purpose of refunding outstanding bonds issued under this Article, the approval required by

G.S. 159D-7

is not required as to the project financed with the bonds to be refunded.

Refunding bonds issued under this section may be sold or exchanged for outstanding bonds issued under this Article and, if sold, the proceeds may be applied, in addition to any other authorized purposes, to the purchase, redemption or payment of such outstanding bonds. Refunding bonds may be issued, in the determination of the agency, at any time not more than five years prior to the date of maturity or maturities or the date selected for the redemption of the bonds being refunded thereby. Pending the application of the proceeds of such refunding bonds, with any other available funds, to the payment of the principal of and accrued interest and any redemption premium on the bonds being refunded, and, if so provided or permitted in the security document securing the bonds to the payment of any interest on such refunding bonds, such proceeds may be invested in direct obligations of, or obligations the principal of and the interest on which are unconditionally guaranteed by, the United States of America if these obligations mature or are subject to redemption by the holder, at the holder’s option not later than the respective dates when the proceeds, together with the interest accruing on them will be required for the purposes intended.

History.

1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1198, s. 1; 1987, c. 517, s. 8; 2000-179, s. 2.

§ 159D-20.
No power of eminent domain.

The agency shall not have any right or power to acquire any property through the exercise of eminent domain or any proceedings in the nature of eminent domain.

History.

1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1198, s. 1; 2000-179, s. 2.

§§ 159D-21,
159D-22.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2000-179, s. 2, effective July 1, 2000.

§ 159D-23.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2001-218, s. 5, effective July 1, 2001.

Editor’s Note.

This section was also amended by Session Laws 2001-487, s. 35, effective July 1, 2001, which deleted the former second paragraph, which consisted of language that had been added by Session Laws 2000-179, s. 2, and that was inadvertently retained. The section is set out above as repealed.

§ 159D-24.
Officers not liable.

No member of the Board of Directors of the agency shall be subject to any personal liability or accountability by reason of the issuance or execution of any bonds.

History.

1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1198, s. 1; 2000-179, s. 2.

§ 159D-25.
Additional method.

The foregoing sections of this Article provide an additional and alternative method for the doing of the things authorized and are supplemental and additional to powers conferred by other laws. They do not derogate any other powers. The issuance of bonds or refunding bonds under the provisions of this Article need not comply with the requirements of any other law applicable to the issuance of bonds.

History.

1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1198, s. 1; 2000-179, s. 2.

§ 159D-26.
Liberal construction.

This Article, being necessary for the prosperity and welfare of the State and its inhabitants, shall be liberally construed to effect its purposes.

History.

1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1198, s. 1; 2000-179, s. 2.

§ 159D-27.
Inconsistent laws inapplicable.

Insofar as the provisions of this Article are inconsistent with the provisions of any general, special or local laws, or parts thereof, the provisions of this Article shall be controlling.

History.

1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1198, s. 1; 2000-179, s. 2.

§§ 159D-28 through 159D-34.

Reserved for future codification purposes.